Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.160

Service—Materials.

The following materials must be served, depending on the type of relief sought.

(1) If the petitioner is seeking a hearing on a petition for a protection order, the respondent must be served with the petition for a protection order, any supporting declarations or other materials, the notice of hearing, any temporary protection order issued by the court, any temporary order to surrender and prohibit weapons issued by the court, and a blank confidential party information form as referred to in RCW 7.105.115(1). The respondent shall confirm with the court during his or her first appearance all necessary contact and identifying information, and file the form with the court.

(2) If the petitioner is seeking the renewal or reissuance of a protection order, the respondent must be served with the motion to renew or reissue the protection order, any supporting declarations or other materials, and the notice of hearing.

(3) If either party is seeking to modify or terminate a protection order, the other party must be served with the motion to modify or terminate the protection order, any supporting declarations or other materials, and the notice of hearing.

(4) For any other motion filed by a party with the court, the other party must be served with all materials the moving party submitted to the court and with any notice of hearing issued by the court related to the motion.

[ 2021 c 215 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.